Utah statutes.
58-67-802.   Form of practice.

(1)  A physician and surgeon licensed under this chapter may engage in practice as a physician and surgeon, or in the practice of medicine only as an individual licensee; but as an individual licensee, he may be:

(a)  an individual operating as a business proprietor;

(b)  an employee of another person;

(c)  a partner in a lawfully organized partnership;

(d)  a lawfully formed professional corporation;

(e)  a lawfully organized limited liability company;

(f)  a lawfully organized business corporation; or

(g)  any other form of organization recognized by the state which is not prohibited by division rule made in collaboration with the board.

(2)  Regardless of the form in which a licensee engages in the practice of medicine, the licensee may only permit the practice of medicine in that form of practice to be conducted by an individual:

(a)  licensed in Utah as a physician and surgeon under Section 58-67-301 or as an osteopathic physician and surgeon under Section 58-68-301; and

(b)  who is able to lawfully and competently engage in the practice of medicine.

